Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit

§ 5041.
Definition.

The term “fresh pursuit” as used in this subchapter shall include fresh pursuit as defined by the common law, and also the pursuit of a person who has committed a felony or who is reasonably suspected of having committed a felony or who is reasonably suspected of operating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol.
It shall also include the pursuit of a person suspected of having committed a supposed felony, though no felony has actually been committed, if there is reasonable ground for believing that a felony has been committed.
Fresh pursuit as used herein shall not necessarily imply instant pursuit, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.

HISTORY:

Amended 1985, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 1; 2017, No. 83, § 161(3).

§ 5042.
Powers of law enforcement officers.

Any member of a duly organized state, county, or municipal law enforcement unit of another state of the United States who enters this State in fresh pursuit, and continues within this State in such fresh pursuit, of a person in order to arrest him or her on the ground that he or she is believed to have committed a felony or operated a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol in such other state, shall have the same authority to arrest and hold in custody such person as a sheriff of this State has to arrest and hold in custody a person on the ground that he or she is believed to have committed a felony or operated a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol in this State.

HISTORY:

Amended 1985, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 2; 2017, No. 83, § 161(3).

§ 5043.
Hearing, commitment, discharge.

If an arrest is made in this State by an officer of another state in accordance with the provisions of section 5042 of this title, he or she shall without unnecessary delay take the person arrested before a Superior judge of the unit in which the arrest was made, who shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest. If the judge determines that the arrest was lawful, he or she shall commit the person arrested to await for a reasonable time the issuance of an extradition warrant by the Governor of this State or admit such person to bail pending the issuance of such warrant. If the judge determines that the arrest was unlawful, he or she shall discharge the person arrested.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 108.

§ 5044.
Construction and separability.

Section 5042 of this title shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this State that would otherwise be lawful.
For the purpose of this subchapter the word “state” shall include the District of Columbia.
If any part of this subchapter is for any reason declared void, it is declared to be the intent of this subchapter that such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this subchapter.

§ 5045.
Short title; interpretation.

This subchapter may be cited as the Uniform Act on Fresh Pursuit and shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of the states that enact it.